Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-702 Priority among different
letters. A person to whom general letters are issued first has exclusive
authority under the letters until the person's appointment is terminated or
modified. If, through error, general letters are afterwards issued to another,
the first appointed representative may recover any property of the estate in
the hands of the representative subsequently appointed, but the acts of the
latter done in good faith before notice of the first letters are not void for
want of validity of appointment. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next